California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
The department may adopt emergency regulations as necessary to implement this article in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The initial adoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall remain in effect for no more
 than 180 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14139.62.

Contingent on the availability of funding, the department shall evaluate the effectiveness of each pilot project on a schedule that coincides with federal waiver reporting requirements, and shall make this information available upon request. The department’s evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Whether or not the pilot project has reduced the fragmentation and improved the coordination of the long-term care delivery system in the pilot project area.

(b) Whether or not the long-term care delivery system is more efficient and makes better use of available resources.

(c) Whether or not the goals identified in Section 14139.11 have been met.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.4. Dialysis, Parenteral Hyperalimentation, and Related Services [14140. - 14144.5.]

14140.

The following definitions shall apply to the provisions of this article:

(a) “Net worth” means:

(1) Personal property, which consists of cash, savings accounts, securities, and similar items; notes, mortgages, and deeds of trust; the cash surrender value of life insurance on the life of the applicant or beneficiary, on the life of the spouse, or any member of the family, except as provided in Section 11158; motor vehicles, except one which meets the transportation needs of the person or family; any other property or equity other than real estate, except that property specified in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of Section 11155.

(2) Real property, including any interest in land of more than nominal interest which does not constitute the home of the applicant for aid under this chapter. The home of the applicant shall be exempt from consideration as net worth under this section to the extent of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in assessed valuation, as assessed by the county assessor.

(3) “Income” which consists of the sum of adjusted gross income as used for purposes of the Federal Income Tax Law.

(b) “Family unit” means:

(1) In the case of a patient who is not married or in a registered domestic partnership and is under 21 years of age living with his or her parent or parents, the patient and his or her parents.

(2) In the case of a patient who is married or in a registered domestic partnership and is under 21 years of age, the patient and his or her spouse.

(3) In the case of a patient over 21 years of age, the patient, and if married or in a registered domestic partnership, the patient’s spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 123.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14141.

Net worth liability shall be determined as of the time of the initial dialysis or parenteral hyperalimentation treatment and shall be reevaluated each year by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14142.

Notwithstanding Section 14005.4 or 14005.7, a person who is otherwise eligible for dialysis and related services under Section 14005.4 or 14005.7, except for his or her income and resource eligibility, is eligible for dialysis and related services under Medi-Cal pursuant to this article, as follows:

(a) A person in a family unit with a net worth of less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall not be liable to pay for dialysis and related services.

(b) A person in a family unit with a net worth of
 five thousand dollars ($5,000) or above shall pay 2 percent of the cost of dialysis and related services for each five thousand dollars ($5,000) of net worth, up to a maximum net worth of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). Persons in a family unit with a net worth above two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) shall not be eligible to receive dialysis under Medi-Cal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14142.5.

Notwithstanding Section 14005.4 or 14005.7, a person requiring parenteral hyperalimentation and related services is eligible for these services under Medi-Cal pursuant to this section, as follows:

(a) A person in a family unit with a net worth of less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall not be liable to pay for parenteral hyperalimentation and related services.

(b) A person in a family unit with a net worth of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or above shall pay 2 percent of the cost of parenteral
 hyperalimentation and related services for each five thousand dollars ($5,000) of net worth, up to a maximum net worth of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). Persons in a family unit with a net worth above two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) shall not be eligible to receive parenteral hyperalimentation under Medi-Cal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 833, Sec. 2.   Effective September 14, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14143.

The health care benefits and services specified in this article, to the extent that such benefits and services are neither provided under any other federal or state law nor provided nor available under other contractual or legal entitlements of the person, shall be provided to any dialysis or parenteral hyperalimentation patient who is a resident of this state and is made eligible by the provisions of this article. After such dialysis or parenteral hyperalimentation patient has utilized such contractual or legal entitlements, the percentages of payment liability under Section 14142 shall then be applied to the remaining cost of dialysis or parenteral
 hyperalimentation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1240, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14144.

The provisions of this article do not apply to indigent dialysis or parenteral hyperalimentation patients who are otherwise eligible for Medi-Cal or to any person eligible for renal dialysis under the provisions of Public Law 92-603 (H.R. 1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1240, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14144.5.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article or of any other statute to the contrary, any person who is eligible under Section 14005.4 or 14005.7 for dialysis, parenteral hyperalimentation, and related services and who is employed and individually earning an amount which exceeds the minimum needs standard, and who receives dialysis services either through a self-dialysis unit of a dialysis clinic or through home dialysis or who receives parenteral hyperalimentation services through self-parenteral hyperalimentation, shall be eligible for dialysis, parenteral hyperalimentation , and related services under Medi-Cal pursuant to this article and shall,
 after utilizing other contractual or legal entitlements pursuant to Section 14143, be liable to pay only the amounts specified in subdivision (b) of Section 14142, except that such percentage obligations shall be 1 percent for each five thousand dollars ($5,000) of family unit net worth up to a maximum net worth of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). Persons eligible for services under this section shall not be subject to Section 14144.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14145 (as amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1240) by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 474.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Development and Implementation of Long-Term Care Integration Pilot Projects [14145. - 14145.3.]

14145.

(a) Beginning with the 1998–99 fiscal year and contingent on appropriation of funds through the Budget Act, the department may contract with a nonprofit entity, incorporated in California that has been formed for the purpose of serving as the center for long-term care integration. The center may serve as a focal point for facilitating the development of community-based local organizing groups through a public-private partnership.

(b) The nonprofit center may do all of the
 following:

(1) Serve in an advisory capacity to the key stakeholders in long-term care integration, including consumers, consumer advocacy groups, researchers, representatives of service providers and purchasers, and local and state policymakers.

(2) Assemble, organize, and make available technical information, data, expertise, and models on long-term care integration from across the state and nation.

(3) Assist local communities with long-term care planning and analysis, development of service delivery and financing systems, statewide data sharing, and private fund development.

(4) Coordinate goals and activities with the State Department of Health Services.

(c) The center may build and
 sustain working partnerships by developing and supporting a cross-county, statewide network of consumers, providers and funders, as well as maintaining an ongoing relationship with the state.

(d) The center may assist the local organizing groups (LOGs) in seeking local financial support, as well as to obtain foundation matching funds for statewide grant-making.

(e) The center may coordinate and disseminate long-term care planning information by identifying key long-term care development issues, and disseminating the information to local planning groups, as needed.

(f) The center may facilitate implementation by identifying and sharing useful tools and resources, designing models for service protocols of the local long-term care integration pilot projects, coordinating information systems, standardizing assessment
 elements, and providing low-cost training and technical assistance to the LOGs as they progress through common tasks necessary for local development and implementation.

(g) The center may collect and track information across LOG sites.

(h) The center may prepare annual progress reports, and shall provide these reports to the department and the budget committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 310, Sec. 108.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14145.1.

(a) The department may administer grants for purposes of this article, that shall be awarded through a request for application process.

(1) Grants may be awarded to local organizing groups (LOGs) that are existing or new community-based nonprofit organizations or government entities for purposes of implementing long-term care integration pilot projects, pursuant to Article 4.05 (commencing with Section 14139.05).

(2) Grants may be available for LOGs in the planning phase, or the development phase of the project, or both. Planning phase grants shall be limited to a maximum award of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Development phase grants shall be limited to a maximum award of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). The planning phase includes activities related to initial planning for a long-term care integration pilot project (LTCIPP). The development phase includes activities for implementing the planning phase, up to actual implementation of the pilot project.

(b) Criteria for grant selection shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) For planning phase grants:

(A) Identification of a LOG committed to development of a LTCIPP that includes major stakeholders, including, but not limited to,
 consumers, community-based providers, institutional providers, and public entities.

(B) Evidence of local government support for development of a LTCIPP.

(C) A description of current and planned consumer involvement.

(D) A plan for the use of funds.

(E) Specification of goals and objectives, and a work plan for achieving them.

(F) A proposed strategy for project evaluation.

(2) For development phase grants:

(A) Identification of the authorized grantee sanctioned by the local government entity.

(B) Identification of an entity for operation of the LTCIPP.

(C) Definition of a governance structure.

(D) An adopted work plan that includes all of the following:

(i) A vision statement describing the long-term care system for the community.

(ii) Description of the covered scope of services and programs to be integrated at the local level.

(iii) Description of the target population.

(iv) Plan for integration of funding for those services.

(E) Specific work goals for the development phase.

(F) A work schedule for completion.

(G) A proposed strategy for project evaluation.

(3) Both planning phase and development phase grant funds may be used for, but are not limited to, the following purposes:

(A) Staff support.

(B) Consulting contracts.

(C) Community organizing support.

(D) Data analysis.

(c) Grantees shall be required to match a portion of the grant awarded, either with cash, or in-kind contributions totaling 20 percent of the total grant. The match required by this subdivision shall be supplemental to the funds appropriated for the
 LTCIPP.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 256.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14145.3.

(a) The department shall develop at least, but not limited to, one alternative model to the Long-Term Care Integration Pilot Program authorized under Article 4.3 (commencing with Section 14139.05) that shall be designed to achieve the goals set forth in Section 14139.11.

(b) The department or, at the discretion of the department, the center for long-term care integration referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 14145, shall consult with an established waiver technical advisory
 committee to assist in the development of an alternative model or models pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) No reimbursement or compensation shall be provided to committee members referred to in subdivision (b).

(d) The department shall report the recommendations of the waiver technical advisory committee to the Legislature on or before December 1, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 537, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.6. Medi-Cal Medical Interpretation Services [14146. - 14146.5.]

14146.

(a) (1) The department shall work with identified stakeholders to conduct a study to identify current requirements for medical interpretation services as well as education, training, and licensure requirements, analyze other state Medicaid programs, and make recommendations on strategies that may be employed regarding the provision of medical interpretation services for Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are limited English proficient (LEP), in compliance with applicable state and federal requirements.

(2) The study also shall assess and make recommendations based on pilot projects, studies, and available data that would further the objectives of this article, including funding for those activities and the allowable use of federal funding.

(b) (1) The department shall work with identified stakeholders to establish a pilot project concurrent with the study.

(2) A pilot project shall include up to four separate sites to evaluate the provision of medical interpretation services for LEP Medi-Cal beneficiaries enrolled in Medi-Cal managed care plans and in fee-for-service Medi-Cal. In identifying sites, the department shall take into account the need for those services, the availability of a pool of medical interpreters that meet the language needs of the Medi-Cal population for use by providers and managed care plans, and the studies and available data identified under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) The department may use or contract with an external vendor, vendors, or other contracted subject matter
 experts to implement the activities described in this section, including the pilot project. However, the vendor for the study shall not be used for the pilot project. The department shall consult with identified stakeholders regarding the draft initial scope of work that shall be used to seek and evaluate proposals pursuant to this section.

(2) At a minimum, the pilot project shall be designed to evaluate all of the following:

(A) Whether Medi-Cal beneficiary satisfaction is greater than for those beneficiaries without access to in-person medical interpretation.

(B) Whether the satisfaction of physicians and surgeons, nurse practitioners, physician assistants, and other health professionals acting within their scope of practice increases.

(C) Whether
 noncompliance with treatment regimens or avoidable medical errors are reduced.

(D) Whether disparities in care are reduced, with respect to LEP Medi-Cal beneficiaries compared with Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are proficient in English.

(E) Whether the Medi-Cal managed care plans identify improvements in quality of care.

(F) The utilization of medical interpreters by providers and Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(d) (1) Each year, commencing in 2017, during the annual state budget process, the department shall provide an update to the budget committees of the Legislature on the implementation of this article.

(2) Any report submitted under this subdivision shall be
 submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) (1) For activities under this section, the department may expend up to three million dollars ($3,000,000) under Provision 14 of Item 4260-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2016 (Chapter 23 of the Statutes of 2016) for the support of activities related to a medical interpreters pilot project, study, or both. In addition, the department shall expend up to five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the pilot project under Provision 15 of Item 4260-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2019 (Chapter 23 of the Statutes of 2019), which shall be available for expenditure, encumbrance, and liquidation until June 30, 2026.

(2) The department may seek any available federal funding for support of activities relating to medical interpretation services as provided under this section.

(3) Expenditure or encumbrance of the funds described in this subdivision is contingent upon approval by the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 62.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 14146.5.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 14146.5.)
-------------------------------------------

14146.5.

This article shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 63.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 4.6, commencing with Section 14146.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.7. Perinatal Services Program [14148. - 14148.85.]

14148.

(a) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the department shall adopt the federal option provided under Section 4101 of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987 (Public Law 100-203) to extend eligibility for medical assistance under Medicaid to all pregnant individuals and infants with family incomes not in excess of 185 percent of the federal poverty level.

(B) Effective January 1, 2014, the federal poverty level percentage income eligibility threshold used pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14005.64 to determine eligibility for medical assistance under this section pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall equal 208 percent of the federal poverty level.

(C) Effective January 1, 2022, eligibility for medical assistance to pregnant individuals with family incomes not in excess of 208 percent of the federal poverty level, before the application of the 5-percent income disregard pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14005.64, shall be as described in Section 14005.22.

(2) If a premium is imposed, the amount of the premium shall not exceed 10 percent of the amount by which the family’s income, less actual child care costs, exceeds 150 percent of the federal poverty level as provided in Section 1916(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396o(c)) as determined, counted, and valued in accordance with the requirements of Section 14005.64. The department shall implement this section by emergency regulation.

(b) Upon order of the Department of Finance, the
 Controller shall transfer funds from Item 4260-101-001 of the Budget Act of 1988 to Item 4260-111-001 of the Budget Act of 1988 during the 1988–89 fiscal year for the purpose of funding outreach efforts for perinatal services.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the state may limit implementation of this section during the 1988–89 fiscal year, based upon the availability of department funds. The department may use maternal and child health funds to finance the increased costs of implementing an expansion of Medi-Cal eligibility to pregnant individuals and to children with incomes of up to 185 percent of federal poverty levels if both of the following conditions exist:

(1) The department has allocated for expenditure at least sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000) in funds redirected from the Medi-Cal program for that expansion.

(2) If, and to the extent, the department determines that estimates of costs based on actual data indicate that the funds are needed to cover costs.

(d) To assist Medi-Cal eligible pregnant individuals in receiving prenatal care promptly, all pregnant individuals applying for Medi-Cal shall be determined to have an immediate need. Counties, within existing resources, shall expedite the eligibility determination process for all pregnant individuals on the basis of their immediate needs. Upon determination of eligibility, a Medi-Cal card shall be issued immediately.

(e) The amendments made to subdivision (a) by Senate Bill 508 during the 2013–14 Regular Session shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 123.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.03.

(a) Pursuant to options provided in federal law and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the form used by a provider to collect information about a pregnant person pursuant to the Medi-Cal temporary benefits program under Section 14148.7 as that program is implemented on January 1, 2003, shall itself qualify as a simplified application for the Medi-Cal program for pregnant people, or, if necessary to ensure federal financial participation, the form shall be modified to add only those elements required for federal financial participation and be as simple as the department considers practicable.

(b) For purposes of this section, the department
 shall determine whether to grant eligibility for temporary benefits under Section 14148.7 and the county shall make the final eligibility determination for the Medi-Cal program. The department shall develop and adopt a process for transferring the application to the county and a followup process that is as simple as the department considers practicable to be used by the county if followup is necessary. Based on the department’s instructions, the county shall make a determination whether followup is necessary to determine the pregnant person’s final eligibility for the Medi-Cal program or to refer the pregnant person to the Medi-Cal Access Program.

(c) The department shall adopt an electronic enrollment process for pregnant people to use when applying for the Medi-Cal program from a provider’s office. The application form for this electronic
 enrollment shall use the elements of the application form described in subdivision (a) and the procedures specified in subdivision (b). This electronic enrollment process shall be known as the Prenatal Gateway. In developing the Prenatal Gateway required by this subdivision, the department shall consult with consumer, provider, county, and health plan representatives.

(d) The purpose of this section is to begin eligibility and benefits at the time of an eligible pregnant person’s visit to a provider and to continue eligibility and benefits until a final eligibility determination is made without the submission of any other application form to the department, the county, or a single point of entry and to make the followup process as simple as the department considers practicable.

(e) The Prenatal Gateway may not be adopted until both of the following occur:

(1) Sufficient moneys have been deposited in the Special Funds Account of the Gateway Fund to defray the costs of developing the Prenatal Gateway.

(2) Sufficient new staff, not to exceed a total of three personnel years, is available at the department for the purposes of this section and Section 14148.04 and is funded through nonstate General Fund sources. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may hire staff necessary to implement this section.

(f) The department shall implement the Prenatal Gateway within 12 months after the date upon which both of the conditions required under subdivision (e) have occurred.

(g) To implement this section, the department may contract with public or private entities, or utilize existing health care service provider enrollment and payment mechanisms, including the Medi-Cal program’s fiscal intermediary, only if services provided under the program are specifically identified and reimbursed in a manner that appropriately claims federal financial reimbursement. Contracts, including the Medi-Cal fiscal intermediary contract for the Child Health and Disability Prevention Program, and including any contract amendment, any system change pursuant to a change order, and any project or systems development notice shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, former Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 11700) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code,
 Section 19130 of the Government Code, and any policies, procedures, or regulations authorized by these laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 372, Sec. 2.   (AB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.04.

(a) The department shall adopt, as specified in this section, an electronic process for families to enroll a deemed eligible newborn in the Medi-Cal program from hospitals that have elected to participate in the process. The electronic enrollment process adopted pursuant to this section shall be known as the Newborn Hospital Gateway.

(b) With respect to the enrollment of a child under one year of age who is deemed to have applied and is deemed eligible for Medi-Cal benefits under Section 1396a(e)(4) of Title 42
 of the United States Code, the enrollment procedures of the Newborn Hospital Gateway shall specifically include procedures for confirming the eligibility of, and issuing a Medi-Cal card to, that child.

(c) In developing the Newborn Hospital Gateway required by this section, the department shall consult with consumer, provider, county, and health plan representatives.

(d) The Newborn Hospital Gateway may not be adopted until both of the following occur:

(1) Sufficient moneys have been deposited in the Special Funds Account of the Gateway Fund to defray the costs of developing the Newborn Hospital Gateway.

(2) Sufficient new staff, not to exceed a total of three personnel years, is available at the department for the purposes of this section and Section
 14148.03 and is funded through nonstate General Fund sources. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may hire staff necessary to implement this section.

(e) The department shall implement the Newborn Hospital Gateway within 12 months after the date upon which both of the conditions required under subdivision (d) have occurred.

(f) To implement this section, the department may contract with public or private entities, or utilize existing health care service provider enrollment and payment mechanisms, including the Medi-Cal program’s fiscal intermediary, only if services provided under the program are specifically identified and reimbursed in a manner that appropriately claims federal financial reimbursement. Contracts, including the Medi-Cal fiscal intermediary contract for the Child Health and Disability Prevention Program and including any contract amendment,
 any system change pursuant to a change order, and any project or systems development notice shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code,
 Section 19130 of the Government Code, and any policies, procedures, or regulations authorized by these laws.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2024, or the effective date for implementation of the Children’s Presumptive Eligibility Program portal pursuant to Section 14011.7, whichever is later, and shall be repealed on January 1 directly following that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 150.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following the inoperative date.   See later operative version added by Sec. 151 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.04.

(a) The department shall adopt, as specified in this section, an electronic process for families to enroll a deemed eligible newborn in the Medi-Cal program from hospitals that have elected to participate in the process. The electronic enrollment process adopted pursuant to this section shall be known as the Newborn Hospital Gateway and shall be accessed through existing presumptive eligibility portals.

(b) All qualified Medi-Cal providers participating in presumptive eligibility programs shall use the Newborn Hospital Gateway system to report a Medi-Cal eligible newborn born in their facilities, including hospitals, birthing centers, or other birthing settings, within 72 hours after birth, or one business day after discharge, whichever is
 sooner.

(c) With respect to the enrollment of a child under one year of age who is deemed to have applied and is deemed eligible for Medi-Cal benefits under Section 1396a(e)(4) of Title 42 of the United States Code, the enrollment procedures of the Newborn Hospital Gateway shall specifically include procedures for confirming the eligibility of, and issuing a Medi-Cal card to, that child.

(d) In developing the Newborn Hospital Gateway required by this section, the department shall consult with consumer, provider, county, and health plan representatives.

(e) To implement this section, the department may contract with public or private entities, or utilize existing health care service provider enrollment and payment mechanisms, including the Medi-Cal program’s fiscal intermediary, only if services provided under the
 program are specifically identified and reimbursed in a manner that appropriately claims federal financial reimbursement. Contracts, including the Medi-Cal fiscal intermediary contract for presumptive eligibility programs and including any contract amendment, any system change pursuant to a change order, and any project or systems development notice shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and any policies, procedures, or regulations authorized by these laws.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024, or the effective date for implementation of the Children’s Presumptive Eligibility Program portal pursuant to Section 14011.7, whichever is later.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 150) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 151.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.05.

(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Gateway Fund.

(b) Moneys in the fund may be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, exclusively for purposes of establishing and maintaining the Prenatal Gateway, as provided for in Section 14148.03, and the Newborn Hospital Gateway, as provided for in Section 14148.04, and in accordance with subdivision (c).

(c) The fund shall consist of the
 following accounts:

(1) The Special Funds Account, which shall consist of all funds received by the Controller for purposes of Sections 14148.03 and 14148.04 from private foundations and other nongovernmental sources and interest accrued thereon. Moneys in this account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of Sections 14148.03 and 14148.04. The department shall not be responsible for securing funding from private foundations or other nongovernmental sources.

(2) The Other Public Funds Account, which shall consist of all public funds, other than federal or state general funds, received by the Controller for purposes of Sections 14148.03 and 14148.04 from state or local sources, including, but not limited to, funds received under the California Families and Children Act of 1998, Division 108 (commencing with Section 130100) of the Health and Safety Code (Proposition 10), and
 the interest accrued thereon.

(3) The Federal Funds Account, which shall consist of all public funds received by the Controller for purposes of Sections 14148.03 and 14148.04 from federal sources, and the interest accrued thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 895, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.1.

To maximize federal financial participation, the department shall seek flexibility in implementing the requirements of Section 121 of the Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-603) for Medi-Cal eligible people with confirmed pregnancies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 372, Sec. 3.   (AB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.2.

In order to assure access to obstetrical providers in the Medi-Cal program, the state department shall explore and adopt policies which improve provider relations with Medi-Cal maternity care providers. Policies to be considered shall include, but not be limited to, those which reduce the annual percentage of obstetrical billings going to the department’s suspense file, simplify provider claim forms, establish toll-free telephone lines for the exclusive use of maternity care providers, and establish clear reimbursement guidelines. In addition, the department shall explore policies to assure that obstetrical claims are processed on a prompt and predictable
 basis, the feasibility of establishing a special claims processing unit for obstetrical claims, and the adequacy of current reimbursement levels and services reimbursed. The department shall advise the Chairs of the Assembly Health Committee and the Senate Health and Human Services Committee by July 1, 1989, on steps taken to improve provider relations and the impact these steps have had on provider participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 980, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.3.

The department shall seek federal approval to implement obstetrical case management for Medi-Cal eligible pregnant people when provided through the Child Health and Disability Prevention program authorized under Article 6 (commencing with Section 124025) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 372, Sec. 4.   (AB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.4.

(a) The department shall eliminate the Medi-Cal reimbursement differential for obstetrical services by equalizing the rates of reimbursement for Caesarean section and non-Caesarean section care and delivery services. In implementing this section, savings that otherwise would have accrued due to lowered rates of reimbursement for Caesarean section services shall be used to fund across-the-board rate increases for all maternity care and delivery services.

(b) Revisions to the existing rate structure required to implement this section shall be adopted as emergency
 regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted to implement this act shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. These regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 348, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.5.

(a) State-funded perinatal services shall be provided under the Medi-Cal program to pregnant persons and state-funded medical services to infants up to one year of age in families with incomes above 185 percent, but not more than 208 percent, of the federal poverty level, in the same manner that these services are being provided to the Medi-Cal population, including eligibility requirements and integration of eligibility determinations and payment of claims. When determining eligibility under this section, an applicant’s or beneficiary’s income and resources shall be determined, counted, and valued in accordance with the methodology set forth in Section 14005.64.

(b) Services provided under this section shall not be subject to any spend down of excess income
 requirements.

(c) (1) The department, in implementing the Medi-Cal program and public health programs, may provide for outreach activities in order to enhance participation and access to perinatal services. Funding received pursuant to the federal provisions shall be used to expand perinatal outreach activities. These outreach activities shall be implemented if funding is provided for this purpose by an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or other statute.

(2) Those outreach activities authorized by paragraph (1) shall be targeted toward both Medi-Cal and non-Medi-Cal eligible high risk or uninsured pregnant persons and infants. Outreach activities may include, but not
 be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Education of the targeted persons on the availability and importance of early prenatal care and referral to Medi-Cal and other programs.

(B) Information provided through toll-free telephone numbers.

(C) Recruitment and retention of perinatal providers.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts required to implement this section shall be exempt from the approval of the Director of General Services and from the Public Contract Code.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 152) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 108.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.5.
